Illinois, session 104th, SB2650.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Business Corporation Act of 1983 is amended 5by changing Section 5.05 as follows: 6    (805 ILCS 5/5.05)  (from Ch. 32, par. 5.05)7    Sec. 5.05. Registered office and registered agent. 8    (a) Each domestic corporation and each foreign corporation 9having authority to transact business in this State shall have 10and continuously maintain in this State:11        (1) (a) A registered office which may be, but need not 12    be, the same as its place of business in this State.13        (2) (b) A registered agent, which agent may be either 14    an individual, resident in this State, whose business 15    office is identical with such registered office, or a 16    domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability 17    company, limited partnership, or limited liability 18    partnership authorized to transact business in this State 19    that is authorized by its statement of purpose to act as 20    such agent, having a business office identical with such 21    registered office.22        (3) (c) The address, including street and number, or 23    rural route number, of the initial registered office, and   SB2650- 2 -LRB104 13165 SPS 25300 b1    the name of the initial registered agent of each 2    corporation organized under this Act shall be stated in 3    its articles of incorporation; and of each foreign 4    corporation shall be stated in its application for 5    authority to transact business in this State.6    (b) A corporation may use a registered office as the 7corporation's principle office if:8        (1) the registered agent maintains the name and 9    residential address of all of the corporation's board 10    members and officers at the registered office or another 11    secure location accessible to the registered agent;12        (2) the registered agent agrees to share the 13    information described in paragraph (1) with the Secretary 14    of State upon written demand; and15        (3) the registered agent makes a written agreement 16    with the corporation to comply with the requirements of 17    paragraphs (1) and (2).18    (c) In the event of dissolution of a corporation, either 19voluntary, administrative, or judicial, the registered agent 20and the registered office of the corporation on record with 21the Secretary of State on the date of the issuance of the 22certificate or judgment of dissolution shall be an agent of 23the corporation upon whom claims can be served or service of 24process can be had during the 5-year, post-dissolution period 25provided in Section 12.80 of this Act, unless such agent 26resigns or the corporation properly reports a change of   SB2650- 3 -LRB104 13165 SPS 25300 b1registered office or registered agent.2    In the event of revocation of the authority of a foreign 3corporation to transact business in this State, the registered 4agent and the registered office of the corporation on record 5with the Secretary of State on the date of the issuance of the 6certificate of revocation shall be an agent of the corporation 7upon whom claims can be served or service of process can be 8had, unless such agent resigns.9(Source: P.A. 96-988, eff. 7-2-10; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11.) 10    Section 10. The General Not For Profit Corporation Act of 111986 is amended by changing Section 114.05 as follows: 12    (805 ILCS 105/114.05)  (from Ch. 32, par. 114.05)13    Sec. 114.05. Annual report of domestic or foreign 14corporation. 15    (a) Annual report of domestic or foreign corporation. Each 16domestic corporation organized under this Act, and each 17foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this 18State, shall file, within the time prescribed by this Act, an 19annual report setting forth:20        (1) (a) The name of the corporation.21        (2) (b) The address, including street and number, or 22    rural route number, of its registered office in this 23    State, and the name of its registered agent at such 24    address.  SB2650- 4 -LRB104 13165 SPS 25300 b1        (3) (c) The address, including street and number, or 2    rural route number, of its principal office.3        (4) (d) The names and respective addresses, including 4    street and number, or rural route number, of its directors 5    and officers.6        (5) (e) A brief statement of the character of the 7    affairs which the corporation is actually conducting from 8    among the purposes authorized in Section 103.05 of this 9    Act.10        (6) (f) Whether the corporation is a Condominium 11    Association as established under the Condominium Property 12    Act, a Cooperative Housing Corporation defined in Section 13    216 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 or a Homeowner 14    Association which administers a common-interest community 15    as defined in subsection (c) of Section 9-102 of the Code 16    of Civil Procedure.17        (7) (g) Such additional information as may be 18    necessary or appropriate in order to enable the Secretary 19    of State to administer this Act and to verify the proper 20    amount of fees payable by the corporation.21    Such annual report shall be made on forms prescribed and 22furnished by the Secretary of State, and the information 23therein required by paragraphs (1) to (4) subsections (a) to 24(d), both inclusive, of this Section, shall be given as of the 25date of the execution of the annual report. It shall be 26executed by the corporation by any authorized officer and   SB2650- 5 -LRB104 13165 SPS 25300 b1verified by him or her, or, if the corporation is in the hands 2of a receiver or trustee, it shall be executed on behalf of the 3corporation and verified by such receiver or trustee.4    (b) A corporation may use a registered office as the 5corporation's principal office if:6        (1) the registered agent maintains the name and 7    residential address of all of the corporation's board 8    members and officers at the registered office or another 9    secure location accessible to the registered agent;10        (2) the registered agent agrees to share the 11    information described in paragraph (1) with the Secretary 12    of State upon written demand; and13        (3) the registered agent makes a written agreement 14    with the corporation to comply with the requirements of 15    paragraphs (1) and (2).16(Source: P.A. 101-578, eff. 8-26-19.) 17    Section 15. The Limited Liability Company Act is amended 18by changing Section 5-5 as follows: 19    (805 ILCS 180/5-5)20    Sec. 5-5. Articles of organization. 21    (a) The articles of organization shall set forth all of 22the following:23        (1) The name of the limited liability company and the 24    address of its principal place of business which may, but   SB2650- 6 -LRB104 13165 SPS 25300 b1    need not be a place of business in this State.2        (2) The purposes for which the limited liability 3    company is organized, which may be stated to be, or to 4    include, the transaction of any or all lawful businesses 5    for which limited liability companies may be organized 6    under this Act.7        (3) The name of its registered agent and the address 8    of its registered office.9        (4) A confirmation that the limited liability company 10    complies with the requirement in subsection (b) of Section 11    5-1 that the company has one or more members at the time of 12    filing or, if the filing is to be effective on a later 13    date, that the company will have one or more members on the 14    date the filing is to be effective.15        (5) The name and business address of all of the 16    managers and any member having the authority of a manager.17        (5.5) The duration of the limited liability company, 18    which shall be perpetual unless otherwise stated. 19        (6) (Blank).20        (7) The name and address of each organizer.21        (8) Any other provision, not inconsistent with law, 22    that the members elect to set out in the articles of 23    organization for the regulation of the internal affairs of 24    the limited liability company, including any provisions 25    that, under this Act, are required or permitted to be set 26    out in the operating agreement of the limited liability   SB2650- 7 -LRB104 13165 SPS 25300 b1    company.2    (b) A limited liability company is organized at the time 3articles of organization are filed by the Secretary of State 4or at any later time, not more than 60 days after the filing of 5the articles of organization, specified in the articles of 6organization.7    (c) Articles of organization for the organization of a 8limited liability company for the purpose of accepting and 9executing trusts shall not be filed by the Secretary of State 10until there is delivered to him or her a statement executed by 11the Secretary of Financial and Professional Regulation or 12successor State board, department, or agency having 13jurisdiction over the regulation of trust companies that the 14organizers of the limited liability company have made 15arrangements with the Secretary of Financial and Professional 16Regulation or successor State board, department, or agency 17having jurisdiction over the regulation of trust companies to 18comply with the Corporate Fiduciary Act.19    (d) Articles of organization for the organization of a 20limited liability company as a bank or a savings bank must be 21filed with the Secretary of Financial and Professional 22Regulation or successor State board, department, or agency 23having jurisdiction over the regulation of banks or savings 24banks or, if the bank or savings bank will be organized under 25federal law, with the appropriate federal banking regulator.26    (e) A limited liability company may use a registered   SB2650- 8 -LRB104 13165 SPS 25300 b1office as the limited liability company's principal place of 2business if:3        (1) the registered agent maintains the name and 4    residential address of all of the limited liability 5    company's board members and officers at the registered 6    office or another secure location accessible to the 7    registered agent;8        (2) the registered agent agrees to share the 9    information described in paragraph (1) with the Secretary 10    of State upon written demand; and11        (3) the registered agent makes a written agreement 12    with the limited liability company to comply with the 13    requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2).14(Source: P.A. 98-171, eff. 8-5-13; 99-227, eff. 8-3-15; 1599-637, eff. 7-1-17.)